North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 19. Petitions for Elections and Referenda.

§ 163-218.
Registration of notice of circulation of petition.

From and after July 1, 1957, notice of circulation of a petition calling for any election or referendum shall be registered with the county board of elections with which the petition is to be filed, and the date of registration of the notice shall be
the date of issuance and commencement of circulation of the petition.

History.
1957, c. 1239, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-219.
Petition void after one year from registration.

Petitions calling for elections and referenda shall be and become void and of no further effect one year after the date the notice of circulation is registered with the county board of elections with which it is required to be filed; and notwithstanding
any public, special, local, or private act to the contrary, no election or referendum shall thereafter be called or held pursuant to or based upon any such void petition.

History.
1957, c. 1239, s. 2; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-220.
Limitation on petitions circulated prior to July 1, 1957.

Petitions calling for elections or referenda which were circulated prior to July 1, 1957, shall be and become void and of no further force and effect one year after the date of issuance of such petitions for circulation; and notwithstanding any public,
special, local, or private act to the contrary, no election or referendum shall be called or held pursuant to or based upon any such void petition from and after July 1, 1957.

History.
1957, c. 1239, s. 3; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-221.
Persons may not sign name of another to petition.

No person may sign the name of another person to any of the following:

Any petition calling for an election or referendum.

Any petition under

G.S. 163-96

for the formulation of a new political party.

Any petition under

G.S. 163-107.1

requesting a person to be a candidate.

Any petition under

G.S. 163-122

to have the name of an unaffiliated candidate placed on the general election ballot, or under

G.S. 163-296

to have the name of an unaffiliated or nonpartisan candidate placed on the regular municipal election ballot.

Any petition under

G.S. 163-213.5

to place a name on the ballot under the Presidential Preference Primary Act.

Any petition under

G.S. 163-123

to qualify as a write-in candidate.

Any name signed on a petition, in violation of this section, shall be void.

Any person who willfully violates this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.
1977, c. 218, s. 1; 1979, c. 534, s. 1; 1987, c. 565, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 1104; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2003-278, s. 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-222 through 163-225.

Reserved for future codification purposes.